tables/da-dk-g26_1993.ctb
# Liblouis: Danish table for 6 dots grade 2 forward and backward translation 1993
#
#  Copyright (C) 2014, 2016-2021, Bue Vester-Andersen <bue@vester-andersen.dk>
#
#  This file is part of liblouis.
#
#  liblouis is free software: you can redistribute it and/or modify it
#  under the terms of the GNU Lesser General Public License as
#  published by the Free Software Foundation, either version 2.1 of the
#  License, or (at your option) any later version.
#
#  liblouis is distributed in the hope that it will be useful, but
#  WITHOUT ANY WARRANTY; without even the implied warranty of
#  MERCHANTABILITY or FITNESS FOR A PARTICULAR PURPOSE. See the GNU
#  Lesser General Public License for more details.
#
#  You should have received a copy of the GNU Lesser General Public
#  License along with liblouis. If not, see
#  <http://www.gnu.org/licenses/>.
#
# Version: Bue Vester-Andersen, December 2022

### Table Metadata

#-name: Dansk forkortet 6-punkt 1993
#-index-name: Danish, contracted, 6-dot, 1993
#-display-name: Danish 6-dot contracted braille (1993 standard)

#+language: da
#+type: literary
#+contraction: full
#+grade: 2
#+dots: 6
#+direction: both
#+system: ddp
#+version: 1993

#-has-nocross: yes

# Display opcodes
include da-dk-octobraille_1993.dis

### Spaces

# These ctrl-chars have to have a representation, so that they can be properly converted back and forth.
space \t 2478 CHARACTER TABULATION
space \n 678 LINE FEED (LF)
space \v 1368 LINE TABULATION
space \f 12378 FORM FEED (FF)
space \r 257 CARRIAGE RETURN (CR)
space \x00a0 a

include spaces.uti

### Character definitions

# Definition of dot cells
punctuation ! 235 EXCLAMATION MARK
punctuation " 2356 QUOTATION MARK
punctuation ' 4 APOSTROPHE
punctuation ( 236 LEFT PARENTHESIS
punctuation ) 356 RIGHT PARENTHESIS
punctuation , 2 COMMA
punctuation - 36 HYPHEN-MINUS
punctuation . 3 FULL STOP
punctuation / 34 SLASH
punctuation : 25 COLON
punctuation ; 23 SEMICOLON
punctuation ? 26 QUESTION MARK
lowercase a 1
lowercase b 12
lowercase c 14
lowercase d 145
lowercase e 15
lowercase f 124
lowercase g 1245
lowercase h 125
lowercase i 24
lowercase j 245
lowercase k 13
lowercase l 123
lowercase m 134
lowercase n 1345
lowercase o 135
lowercase p 1234
lowercase r 1235
lowercase s 234
lowercase t 2345
lowercase u 136
lowercase v 1236
lowercase y 13456

#use 8 dots for the following chars to avoid conflict with indicators
lowercase q 123457
lowercase w 24567
lowercase x 13467
lowercase z 13567
punctuation | 4568 VERTICAL LINE
punctuation ~ 467 TILDE (changed by pass 2 to not conflict with indicators
lowercase \x00fc 12567

include digits6Dots.uti

punctuation \x00a7 346 SECTION SIGN (0xa7)

lowercase \x00e5 16 LATIN LETTER A WITH RING ABOVE
lowercase \x00e6 345 LATIN LETTER AE
lowercase \x00f8 246 LATIN LETTER O WITH STROKE

# Uppercase letters
base uppercase A a
base uppercase B b
base uppercase C c
base uppercase D d
base uppercase E e
base uppercase F f
base uppercase G g
base uppercase H h
base uppercase I i
base uppercase J j
base uppercase K k
base uppercase L l
base uppercase M m
base uppercase N n
base uppercase O o
base uppercase P p
base uppercase R r
base uppercase S s
base uppercase T t
base uppercase U u
base uppercase V v
base uppercase Y y
base uppercase Q q
base uppercase W w
base uppercase X x
base uppercase Z z
base uppercase \x00dc \x00fc
base uppercase \x00c5 \x00e5 LATIN LETTER A WITH RING ABOVE
base uppercase \x00c6 \x00e6 LATIN LETTER AE
base uppercase \x00d8 \x00f8 LATIN LETTER O WITH STROKE

# cover all other Braille patterns
include braille-patterns.cti

# Characters with two or more cells

punctuation # 45-3456 NUMBER SIGN
sign $ 45-256 DOLLAR SIGN
math % 245-356 PERCENT SIGN
sign & 6-12346 AMPERSAND
punctuation * 6-35 ASTERISK
math + 45-235 PLUS SIGN
math < 45-134 LESS-THAN SIGN
math = 45-2356 EQUALS SIGN
math > 45-234 GREATER-THAN SIGN
sign @ 45-1 COMMERCIAL AT
punctuation [ 5-236 LEFT SQUARE BRACKET
punctuation \\ 45-16 REVERSE SLASH
punctuation ] 5-356 RIGHT SQUARE BRACKET
punctuation ^ 45-346 CIRCUMFLEX ACCENT
punctuation _ 45-36 LOW LINE
punctuation ` 4 GRAVE ACCENT
punctuation { 45-246 LEFT CURLY BRACKET
punctuation } 45-135 RIGHT CURLY BRACKET
math \x00f7 45-256 DIVISION SIGN

# Misc unicode characters
include da-dk-6miscChars_1993.cti

# Extra chars for private use:
space \xf800 234f # Used to force a hidden word boundary
letter \xf801 123f # Used to prevent word contractions in certain cases

# Litdigits
include litdigits6Dots.uti
midendnumericmodechars /,.:^

undefined 26

### Braille indicators and special characters

#hyphen - 36

letsign 6

noletsign Ii\x00df\x0149\x0152\x0153

# Emphasis opcodes
emphclass italic
emphclass underline
emphclass bold

begemphphrase italic 56
endemphphrase italic after 56

begemphphrase bold 56
endemphphrase bold after 56

begemphphrase underline 56
endemphphrase underline after 56

capsletter 46
begcapsword 456
endcapsword 6
multind 6-46 letsign capsletter
multind 46-6 capsletter letsign
multind 6-456 letsign begcapsword

numsign 3456
multind 6-3456 letsign numsign

#class of none-space characters that demand double dashes
# Used in context lines later.
#must be the first class defined.
attribute charsWDoubleDash .,?!/:"'() # class w

### Correct - forward translation

# Chars that don't require a space before percent and permille:
attribute charsBeforePercent "(\x201e\x0084\x201c\x0093\x201d\x0094\x00ab\x00bb #class x
noback correct `["%"] *
noback correct !$sx["%"] " %"
noback correct `["\x2030"] *
noback correct !$sx["\x2030"] " \x2030"
noback correct `["\x0089"] *
noback correct !$sx["\x0089"] " \x2030"

# Chars to be treated like digits when switching back to letter mode
attribute extraDigits \x00bc\x00bd\x00be

#Use the "correct" opcode to convert chars that can't be back-translated
# and make the table more simple.

# Dashes
attribute dashes \x2013\x2014\x0096\x0097\x00ad
noback correct %dashes "-"

attribute quotes \x201e\x0084\x201c\x0093\x201d\x0094\x00ab\x00bb 
noback correct %quotes "\""

attribute apostrophes `\x201a\x0082\x2039\x008b\x2018\x0091\x2019\x0092\x203a\x009b\x00b4
noback correct %apostrophes "'"

### Correct - backward translation

# characters that may get mangled by the insertion of extra letsigns
nofor correct "\x2818" "~"
#nofor correct "\x282f" "&"
#nofor correct "\x2814" "*"

# Try to distinguish between times (\x00d7) and bullit (\x2022),
# which share the same Braille representation.
nofor correct `["\x00d7"] "\x2022" 
# nofor correct $d["\s\x00d7\s"]$d * #apparently doesn't work now
nofor correct ["\x00d7"]!$d "\x2022" 
nofor correct !$d["\x00d7"] "\x2022" 

nofor correct "\x28a0" ? # Extraneous endcaps signs
#nofor correct "\x2820" ?
nofor correct "~\\456/" "|"

#ensure \xf800\xf801 between a digit and a letter
noback correct $dy[]$l "\xf800\xf801"
noback correct $dy$Spm.[]$l "\xf800\xf801"
### Pass 1 - Forward and backward

# Remove space between § and numbers.
noback begnum § 346
begnum §\s 346
begnum §§\s 346-346
always §§ 346-346

# Punctuations, math and numbers
#midnum , 2
#midnum . 3
# the following rule is doubtful, but probably does not apply.
#midnum - 36
endnum - 36
#midnum / 34
#midnum : 25
nofor midnum ^ 346
nofor midnum ^ 45-346

midnum ^ 45-346
midnum \x00d7 45-3

# various back rules for math signs etc.
nofor midnum % 0-245-356-0-3456
nofor endnum % 0-245-356
nofor endnum \x2030 0-245-356-356
nofor midnum \x00d7 45-3
#nofor midnum \x00d7 3

# Punctuation
prepunc " 2356
postpunc " 2356
always /\s 6-34-0
always \s/ 0-6-34
nofor always / 6-34
prepunc - 36
postpunc - 36
nofor always \s-\s 0-36-36-0
always :- 25-36
always ;- 23-36
always --- 36-36-36
always ---- 36-36-36-36
always ----- 36-36-36-36-36
# Star enclosed by parentheses
always (*) 236-35-356

before punctuation before sign always ( 6-236

# these characters must be separated from ")" by a letsign.
attribute SepToRightpar Jj%'\x2030\x0089\x201a\x0082\x2039\x009b\x2018\x0091\x2019\x0092\x203a\x009b
after SepToRightpar always ) 6-356
after punctuation after sign always ) 6-356

prepunc ( 236
postpunc ) 356
always .) 3-356
always ( 6-236
always ) 6-356

# extra back rules for ")"
nofor after punctuation always ) 356
nofor always \x00b0 4-356
nofor always ') 4-6-356
nofor always ") 2356-356
nofor endword j) 245-356
nofor always ) 6-356

always ... 3-3-3

# Exclamation and "fra"
always fra! 124-1235-1-235
always !fra 235-124-1235-1
always ?! 26-6-235
always )! 356-6-235
always (!) 236-6-235-356
always "fra" 2356-124-1235-1-2356
always "!" 2356-6-235-2356
always !! 235-235
always !!! 235-235-235
always !!!! 235-235-235-235
always !!!!! 235-235-235-235-235
always '! 4-6-235
always \s! 0-6-235
prepunc ! 6-235
always \x00a1 6-256

### Contractions ###

#Special sequences, urls emails and file names.

nocont $
nocont \x005c
nocont @
nocont ://
nocont www
nocont .com
nocont .dk
nocont .eu
nocont .edu
nocont .gov
nocont .mil
nocont .net
nocont .org
nocont .uk
nocont .doc
nocont .exe
nocont .htm
nocont .tex
nocont .txt
nocont .gif
nocont .jpg
nocont .png
nocont .wav
nocont .tar
nocont .zip

# Ensure no contractions in English ordinal numbers
endnum nd 6-1345-145
endnum st 6-234-2345
endnum ve 6-1236-15

#Words
word af 356
always 'af 4-1-124
word aldrig 1-35
word aig =
word alle 1-15
begnum ae 6-1-15
contraction ae
word allerede 1-123-1235
begnum alr 6-1-123-1235
contraction alr
word alligevel 1-123-1236
begnum alv 6-1-123-1236
contraction alv
word altid 1-2345-145
begnum atd 6-1-2345-145
contraction atd
word altså 1-16
begnum aå 6-1-16
contraction aå
word at 1

word blevet 12-2345
begnum bt 6-12-2345
contraction bt
word blev 12-1236
begnum bv 6-12-1236
contraction bv
word blive 12-3456
word bve 12-1236-15
word bliver 12

word derefter 23456-1356
word derst =
word deres 256
word derfor 23456-124
word derf =
word derigennem 23456-24-12456
word derige 1456-1235-24-12456
word dermed 23456-134
word derm =
word derned 23456-1246
word derne =
word derop 23456-135
word dero =
word derover 23456-1346
word deror =
word derpå 23456-1234
word derp =
word dersom 23456-234
word ders =
word dertil 23456-2345
word dert =
word derunder 23456-12345
word derved 23456-1236
word din 145-1345
begnum dn 6-145-1345
contraction dn
word disse 145-234
begnum ds 6-145-234
contraction ds
word dit 145-2345
begnum dt 6-145-2345
contraction dt
word du 145

word efter 1356
word eller 15
word endnu 15-136
begnum eu 6-15-136
contraction eu

word fik 124-13
begnum fk 6-124-13
contraction fk
word fordi 124-145
begnum fd 6-124-145
contraction fd
word forskellige 124-123456-15
word fske =
word forskelligt 124-123456-2345
word fskt =
word forskellig 124-123456
word fsk =
word for 124
word fra 235
word første 124-1356-15
word først 124-1356
word før 246

word ganske 1245-123456
word gennem 12456
word ge =
word gik 1245-13
begnum gk 6-1245-13
contraction gk
word gør 1245

word ham 236
word hans 13456-234
begnum ys 6-13456-234
contraction ys
word han 13456
word har 125
word havde 125-1456
word hde =
word have 125-3456
word hve =
word helt 125-2345
begnum ht 6-125-2345
contraction ht
word hendes 125-234
begnum hs 6-125-234
contraction hs
word hende 125-145
begnum hd 6-125-145
contraction hd
word hun 136
word hvad 2456
word hv =
word hvis 2456-234
word hvs =
word hvordan 34-1
word hvora 34-6-1
word hvorefter 34-1356
word hvorst 34-234-2345
word hvorfor 34-124
word hvorf 34-6-124
word hvorigennem 34-24-12456
word hvorledes 34-15
word hvore 34-6-15
word hvormed 34-134
word hvorm 34-6-134
word hvornår 34-1345
word hvorn 34-6-1345
word hvorover 34-1346
word hvoror 34-135-1235
word hvorpå 34-1234
word hvorp 34-6-1234
word hvortil 34-2345
word hvort 34-6-2345
word hvorunder 34-12345
word hvornd 34-1345-145
word hvorved 34-1236
word hvorv 34-6-1236
word hvor 34

word igennem 24-12456
word ige =
word igen 35
word (igen) 236-24-1245-126-356
word ig =
word ikke 24-13
begnum ik 6-24-13
contraction ik
word imidlertid 24-24
begnum ii 6-24-24
contraction ii

word jeg 245
word jeg) 245-6-356
